California, session 20252026, AB445.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 23826.21 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:23826.21. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Colusa, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places.(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. (c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.SEC. 2. Section 25600.05 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:25600.05. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Beer manufacturer” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25600.(2) “Case” means a box containing up to 24 pieces of glassware.(3) “Glassware” means a single-service glass container or nonglass container capable of holding no more than 23 ounces of liquid volume and which is intended for the service of beer.(4) “Retail advertising glassware” means glassware that bears conspicuous advertising of beer required of a sign.(b) Notwithstanding Section 25500, Section 25600, or any other law to the contrary:(1) A beer manufacturer, without direct or indirect charge, may give up to five cases of retail advertising glassware to an on-sale retail licensee, per licensed location, each calendar year for use at the licensed location. The giving of retail advertising glassware shall not be conditioned, directly or indirectly, upon the purchase or sale of any product, including, without limitation, any beer manufactured, produced, imported, sold, marketed, or in any other way promoted or represented by the beer manufacturer giving the retail advertising glassware. Retail advertising glassware provided pursuant to this section shall only be delivered by the beer manufacturer providing it to the licensed premises of the retailer receiving the retail advertising glassware. No more than five cases of retail advertising glassware shall be delivered by the beer manufacturer to any single on-sale retail licensed premises.(2) An on-sale retail licensee may accept, without direct or indirect charge, up to 10 cases of retail advertising glassware, per licensed location, from licensed beer manufacturers each calendar year for use at the licensed location. The on-sale retail licensee shall not sell the retail advertising glassware, give it away, or return it to a manufacturer for cash, credit, or replacement. The on-sale retail licensee shall not condition the purchase of a beer manufacturer’s product or products on the giving of retail advertising glassware by that beer manufacturer.(c) A beer wholesaler shall not directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to the costs of glassware or any costs of transportation or shipping or serve as the agent of the beer manufacturer to deliver, stock, or store glassware for an on-sale retailer.(d) A licensee authorized to give retail advertising glassware pursuant to this section shall not be precluded from doing so on the basis of having an interest in any other type of alcoholic beverage license within or outside of the state.(e) A beer manufacturer shall file with the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, records related to glassware provided to an on-sale retail licensee pursuant to this section within 30 days of the delivery of the glassware. In addition, a beer manufacturer shall keep and maintain records for a three-year period of all glassware given pursuant to this section.(f) An on-sale retail licensee shall keep and maintain records for a three-year period of all glassware received pursuant to this section and of all other retail advertising glassware purchased or otherwise received. Such records shall be maintained by the on-sale retail licensee at the licensed premises to which the beer manufacturer delivers the glassware authorized by this section. The on-sale retail licensee shall produce records to the department promptly upon request.(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances of the economy of the County of Colusa that apply only to that county.